public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# vèrbi -<is>ír
# themeT1 + ír/dE
# themeT9 + ime/gH
SFX d Y 280
SFX d ir aralo/B ir
SFX d ir araƚo/B ir
SFX d ir arami/K ir
SFX d ir aratu/O ir
SFX d ir arave/RS ir
SFX d ir aremo/L ir
SFX d ir aren/L ir
SFX d ir areni/M ir
SFX d ir arense ir
SFX d ir aresi/P ir
SFX d ir aresiu/Q ir
SFX d ir arion/L ir
SFX d ir arioni/M ir
SFX d ir arionse ir
SFX d ir arisen/L ir
SFX d ir ariseni/M ir
SFX d ir arisense ir
SFX d ir arision/L ir
SFX d ir arisioni/M ir
SFX d ir arisionse ir
SFX d ir arisié/P ir
SFX d ir arisiéu/Q ir
SFX d ir arison/L ir
SFX d ir arisoni/M ir
SFX d ir arisonse ir
SFX d ir arié/P ir
SFX d ir ariéu/Q ir
SFX d ir aron/L ir
SFX d ir aroni/M ir
SFX d ir aronse ir
SFX d ir arà/JLNR ir
SFX d ir aràe/R ir
SFX d ir arè/JL ir
SFX d ir arèmi/K ir
SFX d ir aré/P ir
SFX d ir arémoi/M ir
SFX d ir arésimo/L ir
SFX d ir arésimoi/M ir
SFX d ir aréu/Q ir
SFX d ir aría/JLNR ir
SFX d ir aríami/K ir
SFX d ir aríatu/O ir
SFX d ir aríe/JLR ir
SFX d ir aríelo/B ir
SFX d ir aríeƚo/B ir
SFX d ir aríemi/K ir
SFX d ir arò/JL ir
SFX d ir aròmi/K ir
SFX d ir en/L ir
SFX d ir endo/E ir
SFX d ir ene ir
SFX d ir eni/M ir
SFX d ir ense ir
SFX d ir ente ir
SFX d ir eralo/B ir
SFX d ir eraƚo/B ir
SFX d ir erami/K ir
SFX d ir eratu/O ir
SFX d ir erave/RS ir
SFX d ir eremo/L ir
SFX d ir eren/L ir
SFX d ir ereni/M ir
SFX d ir erense ir
SFX d ir eresi/P ir
SFX d ir eresiu/Q ir
SFX d ir erion/L ir
SFX d ir erioni/M ir
SFX d ir erionse ir
SFX d ir erisen/L ir
SFX d ir eriseni/M ir
SFX d ir erisense ir
SFX d ir erision/L ir
SFX d ir erisioni/M ir
SFX d ir erisionse ir
SFX d ir erisié/P ir
SFX d ir erisiéu/Q ir
SFX d ir erison/L ir
SFX d ir erisoni/M ir
SFX d ir erisonse ir
SFX d ir erié/P ir
SFX d ir eriéu/Q ir
SFX d ir eron/L ir
SFX d ir eroni/M ir
SFX d ir eronse ir
SFX d ir erà/JLNR ir
SFX d ir eràe/R ir
SFX d ir erè/JL ir
SFX d ir erèmi/K ir
SFX d ir eré/P ir
SFX d ir erémoi/M ir
SFX d ir erésimo/L ir
SFX d ir erésimoi/M ir
SFX d ir eréu/Q ir
SFX d ir ería/JLNR ir
SFX d ir eríami/K ir
SFX d ir eríatu/O ir
SFX d ir eríe/JLR ir
SFX d ir eríelo/B ir
SFX d ir eríeƚo/B ir
SFX d ir eríemi/K ir
SFX d ir erò/JL ir
SFX d ir eròmi/K ir
SFX d ir ese/I ir
SFX d ir esi ir
SFX d ir esto/BI ir
SFX d ir eva/JLPR ir
SFX d ir eve/JL ir
SFX d ir evi/NP ir
SFX d ir evo/JL ir
SFX d ir ion/L [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d ir on/L [cijɉñ]ir
SFX d ir ione [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d ir one [cijɉñ]ir
SFX d ir ioni/M [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d ir oni/M [cijɉñ]ir
SFX d ir ionse [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d ir onse [cijɉñ]ir
SFX d ir isen/L ir
SFX d ir isene ir
SFX d ir iseni/M ir
SFX d ir isense ir
SFX d ir isié/P ir
SFX d ir isiede/P ir
SFX d ir isiege/P ir
SFX d ir iven/L ir
SFX d ir iveni/M ir
SFX d ir ivense ir
SFX d ir ivié/P ir
SFX d ir iviéu/Q ir
SFX d ir ié/P ir
SFX d ir iede/P ir
SFX d ir iege/P ir
SFX d ir iéu/Q ir
SFX d ir é/F ir
SFX d ir éa/JLPR ir
SFX d ir éami/K ir
SFX d ir éau/Q ir
SFX d ir ée/JL ir
SFX d ir éelo/B ir
SFX d ir éeƚo/B ir
SFX d ir éemi/K ir
SFX d ir éi/NP ir
SFX d ir éimo/L ir
SFX d ir éimoi/M ir
SFX d ir éitu/O ir
SFX d ir éndome/G ir
SFX d ir éo/JL ir
SFX d ir éomi/K ir
SFX d ir ésimo ir
SFX d ir évami/K ir
SFX d ir évau/Q ir
SFX d ir évelo/B ir
SFX d ir éveƚo/B ir
SFX d ir évemi/K ir
SFX d ir évimo/L ir
SFX d ir évimoi/M ir
SFX d ir évitu/O ir
SFX d ir évomi/K ir
SFX d ir í ir
SFX d ir í/FP ir
SFX d ir ía/JLPR ir
SFX d ir íami/K ir
SFX d ir íau/Q ir
SFX d ir íe/JL ir
SFX d ir íelo/B ir
SFX d ir íeƚo/B ir
SFX d ir íemi/K ir
SFX d ir íi/NP ir
SFX d ir íimo/L ir
SFX d ir íimoi/M ir
SFX d ir íitu/O ir
SFX d ir ímoi/M ir
SFX d ir índome/G ir
SFX d ir ío/JL ir
SFX d ir íomi/K ir
SFX d ir íselo/B ir
SFX d ir íseƚo/B ir
SFX d ir ísemi/K ir
SFX d ir ísime/H ir
SFX d ir ísimo ir
SFX d ir ísitu/O ir
SFX d ir ísomi/K ir
SFX d ir íu/Q ir
SFX d ir ívami/K ir
SFX d ir ívau/Q ir
SFX d ir ívelo/B ir
SFX d ir íveƚo/B ir
SFX d ir ívemi/K ir
SFX d ir ívimo/L ir
SFX d ir ívimoi/M ir
SFX d ir ívitu/O ir
SFX d ir ívomi/K ir
SFX d r do/B ir
SFX d r me/H ir
SFX d r mo/L ir
SFX d r ndo/E ir
SFX d r r/E ir
SFX d r ralo/B ir
SFX d r raƚo/B ir
SFX d r rami/K ir
SFX d r ratu/O ir
SFX d r rave/RS ir
SFX d r re ir
SFX d r remo/L ir
SFX d r ren/L ir
SFX d r reni/M ir
SFX d r rense ir
SFX d r resi/P ir
SFX d r resiu/Q ir
SFX d r rion/L ir
SFX d r rioni/M ir
SFX d r rionse ir
SFX d r risen/L ir
SFX d r riseni/M ir
SFX d r risense ir
SFX d r rision/L ir
SFX d r risioni/M ir
SFX d r risionse ir
SFX d r risié/P ir
SFX d r risiéu/Q ir
SFX d r rison/L ir
SFX d r risoni/M ir
SFX d r risonse ir
SFX d r rié/P ir
SFX d r riéu/Q ir
SFX d r rme/G ir
SFX d r ron/L ir
SFX d r roni/M ir
SFX d r ronse ir
SFX d r rà/JLNR ir
SFX d r ràe/R ir
SFX d r rè/JL ir
SFX d r rèmi/K ir
SFX d r ré/P ir
SFX d r rémoi/M ir
SFX d r résimo/L ir
SFX d r résimoi/M ir
SFX d r réu/Q ir
SFX d r ría/JLNR ir
SFX d r ríami/K ir
SFX d r ríatu/O ir
SFX d r ríe/JLR ir
SFX d r ríelo/B ir
SFX d r ríeƚo/B ir
SFX d r ríemi/K ir
SFX d r rò/JL ir
SFX d r ròmi/K ir
SFX d r sa ir
SFX d r se/IJLR ir
SFX d r sede ir
SFX d r sege ir
SFX d r sen/L ir
SFX d r sene ir
SFX d r seni/M ir
SFX d r si/FN ir
SFX d r siede ir
SFX d r siege ir
SFX d r sion/L ir
SFX d r sione ir
SFX d r sioni/M ir
SFX d r sionse ir
SFX d r sié ir
SFX d r so/JL ir
SFX d r son/L ir
SFX d r sone ir
SFX d r soni/M ir
SFX d r sonse ir
SFX d r sto/BI ir
SFX d r sé/P ir
SFX d r séu/Q ir
SFX d r va/JLPR ir
SFX d r ve/JL ir
SFX d r vi/NP ir
SFX d r vion/L ir
SFX d r vioni/M ir
SFX d r vionse ir
SFX d r vo/JL ir
SFX d r von/L ir
SFX d r voni/M ir
SFX d r vonse ir
