public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.dic
ŧarpir/dE
ŧernir/dE
ŧerpir/dE
ŧirkuir/dE
ŧitir/dE
ƚangorir/dE
ƚanguidir/dE
ƚestir/dE
ƚexierir/dE
ɉestir/dE
abordir/dE
abortir/dE
adenpir/dE
afarir/dE
aferir/dE
agredir/dE
aldir/dE
amoƚir/dE
amolir/dE
amonir/dE
amorbidir/dE
anuir/dE
apetir/dE
aplaudir/dE
ardir/dE
arguir/dE
asarvir/dE
atribuir/dE
avartir/dE
baƚordir/dE
balordir/dE
bandir/dE
benedir/dE
bensarvir/dE
biankir/dE
boɉir/dE
bojir/dE
bonir/dE
bordir/dE
borir/dE
bortir/dE
brandir/dE
brunir/dE
carir/dE
censir/dE
darokir/dE
deŧarnir/dE
deŧernir/dE
defarir/dE
defenir/dE
deferir/dE
definir/dE
deminuir/dE
deperir/dE
derokir/dE
desapunir/dE
desarnir/dE
desavir/dE
desepeƚir/dE
desepelir/dE
desernir/dE
desfiapir/dE
desfisir/dE
desfornir/dE
desfredir/dE
deskair/dE
deskoƚorir/dE
deskolorir/dE
deskonir/dE
deskoraɉir/dE
deskorajir/dE
deskuxir/dE
despetrir/dE
destranir/dE
dexarir/dE
dexbandir/dE
dexbotir/dE
dexdir/dE
dexerir/dE
dexgradir/dE
dexgranfir/dE
dexgrankir/dE
dexgritoƚir/dE
dexgritolir/dE
dexobedir/dE
dexostruir/dE
dexruđenir/dE
dexrudenir/dE
dexruxenir/dE
diɉarir/dE
diɉerir/dE
dijarir/dE
dijerir/dE
diminuir/dE
dir/dE
distribuir/dE
divartir/dE
dixdir/dE
dixerir/dE
dolŧir/dE
dolsir/dE
efeltrir/dE
enpir/dE
exaudir/dE
exaurir/dE
exebir/dE
exibir/dE
faƚir/dE
falir/dE
farir/dE
farsir/dE
favorir/dE
fenir/dE
ferir/dE
fiapir/dE
finir/dE
fiorir/dE
fluir/dE
forbir/dE
fornir/dE
furbir/dE
fuxir/dE
galdir/dE
garantir/dE
garofoƚir/dE
garofolir/dE
gradir/dE
granir/dE
granxir/dE
gremir/dE
grixoƚir/dE
grixolir/dE
gruñir/dE
guarantir/dE
guarir/dE
guarnir/dE
inđalir/dE
inđelir/dE
inŧarnir/dE
inŧarpidir/dE
inŧernir/dE
inŧerpidir/dE
inŧivilir/dE
inŧokir/dE
inɉandoƚir/dE
inɉandolir/dE
inɉotir/dE
inaŧidir/dE
inagrir/dE
inasidir/dE
inasprir/dE
inaxenir/dE
inbaƚordir/dE
inbakukir/dE
inbalordir/dE
inbarir/dE
inbarlumir/dE
inbastardir/dE
inbastir/dE
inbaukir/dE
inberir/dE
inbestiaƚir/dE
inbestialir/dE
inbiondir/dE
inbirir/dE
inbolsir/dE
inbonir/dE
inbotir/dE
inbrandir/dE
inbrunir/dE
inbuƚir/dE
inbulir/dE
inbuxarir/dE
indalir/dE
indeboƚir/dE
indebolir/dE
indelir/dE
indir/dE
indolŧir/dE
indolsir/dE
indurir/dE
inegrir/dE
infarir/dE
infastidir/dE
infatir/dE
infemenir/dE
inferir/dE
infiakir/dE
infiankir/dE
infiapir/dE
infierir/dE
infisir/dE
influir/dE
infrapoƚir/dE
infrapolir/dE
infroƚir/dE
infrolir/dE
ingarbir/dE
ingarofoƚir/dE
ingarofolir/dE
ingoƚoxir/dE
ingoloxir/dE
ingraŧianir/dE
ingramir/dE
ingrandir/dE
ingranfir/dE
ingranir/dE
ingrasianir/dE
ingremir/dE
ingretoƚir/dE
ingretolir/dE
ingriñoƚir/dE
ingriñolir/dE
ingriŧolir/dE
ingringoƚir/dE
ingringolir/dE
ingrisoƚir/dE
ingrisolir/dE
ingritoƚir/dE
ingritolir/dE
ingrixoƚir/dE
ingrixolir/dE
ingrosir/dE
ingrotir/dE
ingrotoƚir/dE
ingrotolir/dE
inibir/dE
injandoƚir/dE
injandolir/dE
injotir/dE
inkañir/dE
inkaŧir/dE
inkaƚir/dE
inkaƚorir/dE
inkaƚotir/dE
inkalir/dE
inkalorir/dE
inkalotir/dE
inkandir/dE
inkankarir/dE
inkankrenir/dE
inkanutir/dE
inkarbonir/dE
inkarir/dE
inkasir/dE
inkoŧir/dE
inkoƚorir/dE
inkokaƚir/dE
inkokalir/dE
inkolorir/dE
inkonpir/dE
inkoraɉir/dE
inkorajir/dE
inkosir/dE
inkotir/dE
inkuixir/dE
inmarŧir/dE
inmarmorir/dE
inmarsir/dE
inmatir/dE
inmatonir/dE
inmaxarir/dE
inmaxerir/dE
inmixarir/dE
inmixerir/dE
inmorbidir/dE
inmufir/dE
inmutir/dE
inmuxonir/dE
inobeƚir/dE
inobelir/dE
inorbir/dE
inpaƚidir/dE
inpadronir/dE
inpalidir/dE
inparonir/dE
inpasir/dE
inpaurir/dE
inpedir/dE
inpenir/dE
inpensierir/dE
inpetir/dE
inpetrir/dE
inpikoƚir/dE
inpikolir/dE
inpinir/dE
inpoltronir/dE
inpontir/dE
inputridir/dE
inrabir/dE
inraukir/dE
inrikir/dE
inrokir/dE
inrosir/dE
inruđenir/dE
inrudenir/dE
inruvidir/dE
inruxenir/dE
insaorir/dE
insarnir/dE
insarpidir/dE
insekir/dE
inselvadegir/dE
inselvadigir/dE
insemenir/dE
insenetir/dE
insernir/dE
inserpidir/dE
insiñir/dE
insipidir/dE
insir/dE
insiviƚir/dE
insivilir/dE
inskaturir/dE
inskurir/dE
insokir/dE
insonoƚir/dE
insonolir/dE
insordir/dE
insorir/dE
insospetir/dE
instekir/dE
institikir/dE
instituir/dE
instornir/dE
instremir/dE
instruir/dE
insuparbir/dE
insuperbir/dE
insurir/dE
insutiƚir/dE
insutilir/dE
intardir/dE
intariŧir/dE
intarisir/dE
intarlokuir/dE
intenarir/dE
intenerir/dE
intepidir/dE
interdir/dE
interiŧir/dE
interisir/dE
interlokuir/dE
intimorir/dE
intiriŧir/dE
intirisir/dE
intixikir/dE
intorbidir/dE
intorbir/dE
intristir/dE
intuir/dE
inumidir/dE
inuvoƚir/dE
inuvolir/dE
invagir/dE
inveƚenir/dE
invecir/dE
invelenir/dE
inviƚanir/dE
inviƚir/dE
invilanir/dE
invilir/dE
inxaƚir/dE
inxalir/dE
inxarir/dE
inxeƚir/dE
inxeƚoxir/dE
inxelir/dE
inxeloxir/dE
inxentiƚir/dE
inxentilir/dE
inxerir/dE
irokir/dE
iruđenir/dE
irudenir/dE
iruvidir/dE
iruxenir/dE
iskaturir/dE
iskurir/dE
istekir/dE
istitikir/dE
istituir/dE
istoƚidir/dE
istolidir/dE
istremir/dE
jestir/dE
kair/dE
kanutir/dE
kapir/dE
karpir/dE
kondir/dE
kondurir/dE
konfarir/dE
konferir/dE
konfluir/dE
konpatir/dE
konpir/dE
kontradir/dE
kontrir/dE
kostituir/dE
kostruir/dE
kuñir/dE
kuxir/dE
langorir/dE
languidir/dE
lestir/dE
lexierir/dE
maƚedir/dE
maledir/dE
marŧir/dE
marsir/dE
matir/dE
maxarir/dE
morbidir/dE
morfir/dE
mufir/dE
munir/dE
mutir/dE
mutoƚir/dE
mutolir/dE
nanir/dE
negrir/dE
nobiƚir/dE
nobilir/dE
nudrir/dE
nuvoƚir/dE
nuvolir/dE
oƚir/dE
obedir/dE
olir/dE
ordir/dE
orir/dE
ostruir/dE
padir/dE
pair/dE
partorir/dE
parvartir/dE
pasir/dE
patir/dE
perir/dE
pervartir/dE
pikoƚir/dE
pikolir/dE
predir/dE
prefarir/dE
preferir/dE
premunir/dE
profarir/dE
proferir/dE
proibir/dE
punir/dE
rabir/dE
radolŧir/dE
radolsir/dE
rafredir/dE
rasir/dE
rauŧir/dE
rausir/dE
realdir/dE
reboɉir/dE
rebojir/dE
redir/dE
refarir/dE
referir/dE
refornir/dE
refuxir/dE
rekostruir/dE
rekuiđir/dE
rekuixir/dE
repeƚir/dE
resavir/dE
restabilir/dE
retribuir/dE
revarir/dE
revelir/dE
rexarsir/dE
rikir/dE
risolir/dE
roñir/dE
rokir/dE
ronkir/dE
rostir/dE
ruđenir/dE
rudenir/dE
ruxenir/dE
sapunir/dE
sarnir/dE
sarvir/dE
scordir/dE
sepeƚir/dE
sepoƚir/dE
sernir/dE
sfardir/dE
sferdir/dE
sfinir/dE
sfredir/dE
sitir/dE
skaltrir/dE
skarnir/dE
skasir/dE
skoƚorir/dE
skonir/dE
skorajir/dE
skuxir/dE
sobojir/dE
sordir/dE
sostituir/dE
spaurir/dE
spikoƚir/dE
spuŧolir/dE
spusolir/dE
stabiƚir/dE
stalir/dE
starnir/dE
statuir/dE
stoƚir/dE
stornir/dE
stranŧir/dE
stransir/dE
stravanir/dE
stupidir/dE
suɉarir/dE
subir/dE
sujerir/dE
superbir/dE
sutilir/dE
suxerir/dE
tardir/dE
terir/dE
tornir/dE
tradir/dE
trasfarir/dE
traxaƚir/dE
traxgredir/dE
vanpir/dE
viƚir/dE
xaudir/dE
xbalordir/dE
xbanpir/dE
xbiankir/dE
xgañoƚir/dE
xgangir/dE
xgangolir/dE
xgremir/dE
xgretolir/dE
xgriñolir/dE
xgrixolir/dE
xlangoƚir/dE
xlangorir/dE
xlexerir/dE
xmagrir/dE
xmaltir/dE
xmarir/dE
xmartir/dE
xmenuir/dE
xmilsir/dE
xmorfir/dE
xvanir/dE
